Wyoming, session 2025, SF0168.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 9-1-417(a), 9-2-102(a)(iii),
9-2-1012(e) and by creating a new subsection (j),
9-2-1013(d)(ii), (iii)(B), (iv) and by creating a new
paragraph (vii), 9-3-413.1(a)(v), 9-4-601(d)(intro), (iv),
(vii) and (ix), 21-16-720(b), 35-1-1002(a)(vi),
35-11-528(e), 35-11-529(a) and (b), 39-14-801(d)(intro) and
39-19-111(a)(intro) are amended to read:
9-1-417. Interfund loans; repayment; maximum amount;
interest.
(a) The state treasurer and the state auditor may
utilize interfund loans from the legislative stabilization
reserve account, or the general fund if insufficient funds
exist in the legislative stabilization reserve account, to
any other fund or account to meet obligations which come
due prior to receipt of revenues. The interfund loans shall
be repaid as soon as the anticipated revenue is received.
The total amount of interfund loans under this subsection
outstanding at one (1) time shall not exceed sixty million
dollars ($60,000,000.00). These loans shall not be used to
fund shortages caused by expenditures exceeding projected
revenues but are to be used only to fund temporary
shortages caused by meeting obligations which come due
prior to receipt of revenues. The interest charged on each
interfund loan under this subsection, other than to the
general fund, or budget reserve account, shall be the
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0168
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
interest rate earned on pooled fund investments in the
previous fiscal year.
9-2-102. Department of health; duties and
responsibilities; state grants.
(a) The department of health is the state mental
health authority, the developmental disabilities authority
and the substance abuse authority. The department through
its divisions has the following duties and responsibilities
to:
(iii) Establish minimum standards and approve
policies and procedures for the establishment and operation
of community-based mental health, substance abuse and
developmental disabilities programs receiving state
support. The department through its mental health division
and its substance abuse division shall annually withhold
not less than five percent (5%) of all amounts provided in
each contract with a community-based mental health or
substance abuse program or provider and shall not release
the funds withheld to the individual program or provider
until the respective division and the individual program or
provider enter into a written agreement that provides for
performance and outcome measures. If the respective
division and an individual program or provider do not enter
into a mutually agreed upon set of performance and outcome
measures, the funds withheld under this paragraph shall
revert to the budget reserve account general fund at the
end of the biennium in which the funds were withheld;
9-2-1012. Duties of the department; transmittal of
standard budget and manual; return of completed exception
and expanded budgets; submission to governor; disposition
of excess general fund appropriations; submission of
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0168
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
selected budget information to joint appropriations
committee.
(e) In preparing the overall state budget for
distribution to the legislature, including any
supplemental, budget shortfall or other emergency changes
to the budget, the governor shall recommend to the
legislature that not less than five percent (5%) of
estimated general fund receipts for the next biennial
budget period shall be appropriated from maintained in the
general fund to the budget as a reserve account within the
earmarked fund. This appropriation shall be in addition to
any fund balance within the budget reserve account. At the
end of each biennial budget period, general fund
appropriations for the biennium in excess of expenditures
including encumbrances during the biennium, as identified
by the state auditor in accordance with the provisions of
W.S. 9-2-1008 and 9-4-207, shall be transferred into the
budget reserve account. All funds in the budget reserve
account shall be invested by the state treasurer and
earnings therefrom shall be credited into the general fund.
Appropriations to the account shall not lapse at the end of
any fiscal period. Expenditures from the budget reserve
account shall be by legislative appropriation only amount.
This general fund reserve amount request shall be separate
from all other requests for appropriations during the
biennial budget period for which it is recommended. Subject
to accrual accounting principles, any unappropriated fund
balance in the general fund on June 30 in the last year of
each biennial budget period in excess of the general fund
reserve amount recommended under this subsection shall be
transferred to the legislative stabilization reserve
account.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0168
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(j) At the end of fiscal year 2028 and the end of
each succeeding fiscal biennium and subject to accrual
accounting principles, the state auditor shall transfer the
unobligated, unencumbered fund balance as defined in W.S.
9-2-1002(a)(xxii) of the general fund in excess of the
amount specified in subsection (e) of this section for that
fiscal biennium to the legislative stabilization reserve
account.
9-2-1013. State budget; distribution of copies to
legislators; copies and reports of authorizations;
interfund loans.
(d) In addition to the items contained in subsection
(a) of this section and notwithstanding any other
recommendations made by the governor, the state budget
shall also include the governor's recommendations for
appropriations for the ensuing two (2) years, or if a
supplemental budget request, the remainder of the budget
period, subject to the following:
(ii) The total recommended appropriations under
this subsection for any two (2) fiscal year budget period
shall not exceed the total estimated revenues for that two
(2) year period. The total estimated revenues computed
under this paragraph shall not include increases in
existing revenue sources which would be available to the
state only after enactment of legislation in addition to
existing law, but shall include the unencumbered balances
in all other accounts in all other expendable funds subject
to this section, and as further provided herein, as those
funds are identified in accordance with standards
promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board,
but specifically excluding pension funds, nonexpendable
trust funds, debt service funds and intragovernmental
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0168
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
funds, that would be available for that budget period.
Funds within the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund
reserve account created under W.S. 9-4-719(b), the common
school permanent fund reserve account created under W.S.
9-4-719(f), funds within the legislative stabilization
reserve account in excess of the limitation under
subparagraph (iii)(C) of this section, or funds within five
percent (5%) of estimated subsection and the general fund
receipts for the next biennium to be appropriated to the
budget reserve account as required amount specified by W.S.
9-2-1012(e) shall not be included in total estimated
revenues computed under this paragraph. Funds from a
contingent appropriation shall not be included as an
estimated source of revenue or funds available unless those
funds previously had been authorized to be expended within
the fiscal period covering the budget period of the
recommendation;
(iii) The total recommended appropriations under
this subsection shall not include any of the following:
(B) The transfer of funds from an account
to another account; except transfers from the budget
reserve account;
(iv) As used in this subsection,
"appropriations" include any of the following:
(A) Specific legislative authorization to
expend state revenues contained in a budget bill that is
enacted into law;,
(B) An amount to be expended from an
account which does not require additional specific
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0168
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
legislative authorization;, the transfer of funds from the
budget reserve account to another account or
(C) A specific statutory distribution of a
revenue source.;
(vii) The state budget may include
recommendations for additional funding for state agencies
that receive federal mineral royalties or severance tax
distributions and for local governments from federal
mineral royalties or severance tax distributions under W.S.
9-4-601(d)(iv) and 39-14-801(d), subject to the following:
(A) To the extent the legislature
appropriates funds under this paragraph from the general
fund for local governments, the appropriation shall comply
with and be subject to the following:
(I) The amount appropriated to local
governments shall not exceed the amount available under
this paragraph, less appropriations under this paragraph to
state agencies;
(II) A total amount shall be annually
appropriated to the state treasurer to be distributed to
all local governments as follows:
(1) Thirty percent (30%) to
counties, in the proportion which the population of the
county bears to total state population;
(2) Seventy percent (70%) to
cities and towns, each city and town to receive an amount
in the proportion which the population of the city or town
bears to the population of all cities and towns in Wyoming.
6

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0168
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(III) The distributions to local
governments under this paragraph shall be made by the state
treasurer not later than October 15 of the fiscal year next
following the fiscal year for which the appropriation is
made. The distributions shall be from revenues actually
recognized in the fiscal year for which the appropriation
is made. Any interest earned on invested funds allocated to
local governments under this paragraph shall be retained in
the general fund as a reserve amount.
(B) To the extent that actual recognized
revenues are less than the estimated deposits referenced in
this paragraph:
(I) The distribution of any
appropriation to local governments under this paragraph
shall be reduced by a pro rata amount; and
(II) The state auditor shall reduce
the spending authority of any state agency receiving an
appropriation under this paragraph by a pro rata amount.
(C) As used in this paragraph:
(I) "Local government" means any
county or municipality;
(II) "State agency" means the
department of transportation, the University of Wyoming and
the water development office.
9-3-413.1. Members' and employers' contributions
based on actuarially determined contribution rates;
calculation of rates; reports.
7

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0168
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(a) Beginning with the 2027-2028 fiscal biennium, the
retirement system shall calculate the percentage of salary
for members' contributions required under W.S. 9-3-412(a)
and for the employers' contribution required under W.S.
9-3-413 based on an actuarially determined contribution
rate in accordance with the following:
(v) After calculation of the actuarially
determined contribution rate under paragraph (ii) of this
subsection, the state budget department and the retirement
system shall calculate necessary amounts to account for any
changes in the appropriations necessary to fund the
contributions for the public employee retirement plan and
shall include those amounts in the budget prepared under
W.S. 9-2-1010 through 9-2-1014.1 9-2-1014, including
changes in amounts for school districts necessary to
account for the employer's share of the actuarially
determined contribution rate in accordance with this
section for benefits paid from the education resource block
grant model defined in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv) and as
enumerated in Attachment A(b)(xxxviii), as defined in W.S.
21-13-101(a)(xvii);
9-4-601. Distribution and use; funds, accounts,
cities and towns benefited; exception for bonus payments.
(d) Except as provided in subsections (k), (m), (n)
and subsection (o) of this section, any revenue received
under subsection (a) of this section in excess of two
hundred million dollars ($200,000,000.00) shall be
distributed as follows:
8

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0168
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(iv) Subject to paragraphs (vii) and (ix) of
this subsection, two-thirds (2/3) to the budget reserve
account general fund;
(vii) From the amounts that would otherwise be
distributed to the budget reserve account general fund
under paragraph (iv) of this subsection and paragraphs
(k)(ii), (m)(ii), (n)(ii) and (o)(ii) of this section,
amounts necessary to make the required revenue bond
payments as provided by W.S. 9-4-1003(d), but in no event
more than eighteen million dollars ($18,000,000.00)
annually;
(ix) For the period beginning July 1, 2019 and
ending June 30, 2049, from the amounts that would otherwise
be distributed to the budget reserve account general fund
under paragraph (iv) of this subsection, the first eight
million dollars ($8,000,000.00) shall be distributed to a
separate account for the University of Wyoming. These
funds are continuously appropriated to the university upon
deposit to the account. The University of Wyoming shall
reduce its standard budget request for the 2021-2022
biennium by an amount equal to the maximum amount of funds
authorized to be deposited under this paragraph. The
University of Wyoming shall acknowledge this reduction of
its 2021-2022 budget request pursuant to this paragraph in
each standard budget request submitted to the governor's
office through June 30, 2048.
21-16-720. Annual report and budget.
(b) The authority shall submit its budget for review
as provided by W.S. 9-2-1010 through 9-2-1014.1 9-2-1014.
35-1-1002. Definitions.
9

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0168
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(a) As used in this article:
(vi) "Unobligated," for purposes of W.S.
35-1-1003(b), and (d), means no commitment meeting the
requirements of subparagraph (iii)(B) of this subsection
was received prior to June 30, 2012.
35-11-528. Municipal solid waste facilities cease and
transfer program created; criteria for grants and loans;
loan terms; availability of other state funding sources.
(e) Loans may be made under the program at zero
interest rate, up to an annual interest rate equal to the
average prime interest rate as determined in accordance
with this subsection. Loans provided under the program
shall be adequately collateralized as determined by the
state loan and investment board. Principal and interest
payments shall be deposited in the budget reserve account
general fund. The state loan and investment board shall
establish interest rates to be charged for loans under the
program, but the interest rate shall not exceed an annual
interest rate equal to the average prime interest rate as
determined by the state treasurer. To determine the
average prime interest rate, the state treasurer shall
average the prime interest rate for at least seventy-five
percent (75%) of the thirty (30) largest banks in the
United States. The interest rate shall be adjusted on
January 1 of each year. Interest rates shall be
established in recognition of the repayment abilities and
needs of the local municipal solid waste facility operator
eligible for loans under the program. The state loan and
investment board shall establish loan amortization
schedules, terms and conditions for each loan approved
based on an applicant's need, financial condition of the
10

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0168
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
landfill operator or the entity responsible for solid waste
funding, the projected life of the transfer facility and
the ability of that entity to repay the loan in a timely
manner.
35-11-529. Municipal solid waste facilities cease and
transfer accounts created; authorized expenditures from the
accounts.
(a) There is created the municipal solid waste cease
and transfer grant account. Monies from the account shall
be awarded for grants to fund approved activities pursuant
to W.S. 35-11-528. Interest earned by this account shall
be deposited in the budget reserve account general fund.
Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207(a),
funds deposited in this account shall not revert without
further action of the legislature.
(b) There is created the municipal solid waste cease
and transfer loan account. Monies from the account shall
be awarded for loans to fund approved activities pursuant
to W.S. 35-11-528. Interest earned by this account shall
be deposited in the budget reserve account general fund.
Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207(a),
funds deposited in this account shall not revert without
further action of the legislature.
39-14-801. Severance tax distributions; distribution
account created; formula.
(d) After making distributions pursuant to
subsections (b), (c), (f) and (j) of this section,
distributions under subsection (e) of this section shall be
made from the severance tax distribution account. The
amount of distributions under subsection (e) of this
11

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0168
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
section shall not exceed one hundred fifty-five million
dollars ($155,000,000.00) in any fiscal year. To the extent
that distributions under subsection (e) of this section
would exceed that amount in any fiscal year, except as
provided in subsections (g), (h), (k) and (m) of this
section, the excess shall be credited: to the general fund.
39-19-111. Distribution.
(a) All money collected under W.S. 39-19-101 through
39-19-111 shall be credited as follows: to the general
fund.
Section 2. W.S. 9-2-1014.1, 9-4-601(k), (m) and (n),
35-1-1003(d), 39-14-801(d)(i), (ii), (g), (h) and (k) and
39-19-111(a)(i) and (ii) are repealed.
Section 3. The budget reserve account is repealed.
Section 4. On July 1, 2026, all funds in the budget
reserve account shall be transferred by the state auditor
to the general fund. Any unexpended funds that have been
appropriated or obligated from the budget reserve account
before July 1, 2026 shall be paid from the general fund.
Any funds that are directed to revert by law to the budget
reserve account shall revert to the general fund. All
accrued revenues that would otherwise be deposited in the
budget reserve account shall be deposited in the general
fund.
Section 5. Not later than October 31, 2026 and again
not later than October 31, 2027, the state auditor shall
report to the joint appropriations committee on the amounts
transferred under section 4 of this act.
12

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0168
ENROLLED ACT NO. 21, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 6. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
13